Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7533
Appeals.

Any order or decision of the director made pursuant to the Property and Casualty Insurance Rate and Form Act may be appealed by any party in interest. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 33.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.